Utah statutes.
63M-11-202.   Executive director -- Qualifications -- Appointment -- Functions.

(1) (a)  Subject to Subsections (1)(b) and (c), the executive director of the Center on Aging shall appoint an executive director of the commission.

(b)  The executive director appointed under Subsection (1)(a) shall be a person knowledgeable and experienced in matters relating to:

(i)  management; and

(ii)  the aging population.

(c)  The appointment described in Subsection (1)(a) is not effective until ratified by the governor.

(2)  The executive director of the commission, under the direction of the commission and the executive director of the Center on Aging, shall administer the duties of the commission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

